Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2251.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2170(a) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2170. Reimbursement of expenses.(a) [General rule] Reimbursement.--The commission shall provide for reimbursement to each municipality of the entire amount of the allowable tuition and the ordinary and necessary living and travel expenses incurred by their police officers while attending certified municipal police basic training schools if the municipality adheres to the training standards established by the commission. The regular salary of police officers while attending approved schools shall be paid by the employing municipality. The commission shall reimburse the employing municipality for 60% of the regular salaries of police 123456789101112131415161718 officers while attending schools approved under this subchapter. The commission shall require written documentation of all expenses incurred by municipalities relating to the training of municipal police officers for the purposes of reimbursement by the commission. All municipalities shall annually audit these funds as part of their annual audit and submit a copy of the audit to the commission. Failure to perform the audit and submit a copy of it to the commission shall render the municipality in violation of this subchapter. Of the total State funds available under this subsection, the commission shall annually allocate 25% of the State funds to townships and boroughs with a population of less than 20,000 residents. If, after a good faith effort, the commission cannot allocate the full 25% due to a lack of eligible applicants during a calendar year, any remaining State funds for that calendar year may be awarded to other eligible municipalities.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2251PN2944 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718